Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.330

Powers may be exercised with relation to public rights-of-way without franchise—Conditions.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to construct or maintain metropolitan facilities in, along, on, under, over, or through public streets, bridges, viaducts, and other public rights-of-way without first obtaining a franchise from the county or city having jurisdiction over the same: PROVIDED, That such facilities shall be constructed and maintained in accordance with the ordinances and resolutions of such city or county relating to construction, installation and maintenance of similar facilities in such public properties.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.330. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 33.]